Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 35
STATE YOUTH SERVICES CENTER

Section.

33-3501. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-3502. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-3503. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-3504. Title to property

Acquiring, selling or exchanging property. [Repealed.]

33-3505. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-3506. Sectarian tests prohibited.

No religious or sectarian tests shall be applied to the selection of instructors or other employed personnel of the school.

33-3507. Religious services.

The superintendent shall provide for the holding of religious services on the Sabbath Day for the inmates of said school, such services to be conducted by ministers of the several religious denominations to which the inmates may belong.

33-3508. Report of director.

The director shall, at the close of each month, present a report to the board of trustees showing the number of students admitted, the number in attendance and the number discharged and whether by parole or otherwise, and the general condition of the school and such other information, suggestions and recommendations as may be to the best interests of the school.

33-3509 — 33-3513. Appointment and qualifications of teachers — Report and duties of superintendent — Religious services — School as independent district — School to be nonsectarian — Courses of study. [Repealed.]